de: Gittermaterial: Aluminium; Fiberglas; Glas; Metall; Kunststoff; Polycarbonat (PC); Polyester; Edelstahl; Stahl; Sonstiges
sv: Skärmmaterial: Aluminium; Glasfiber; Glas; Metall; Plast; Polykarbonat (PC); Polyester; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Övrigt
pl: Materiał ekranu: Aluminium; Włókno szklane; Szkło; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliwęglan (PC); Poliester; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Inne
fr: Matériau de l’écran: Aluminum; Fibre de verre; Verre; Métal; Plastique; Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Autre
zh-CN: 屏幕材料: 铝; 玻璃纤维; 玻璃; 金属; 塑料; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 聚酯纤维; 不锈钢; 钢; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál obrazovky: Hliník; Sklolaminát; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Polykarbonát (PC); Polyester; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Iné
ro-RO: Material ecran: Aluminiu; Fibră de sticlă; Sticlă; Metal; Plastic; Policarbonat (PC); Poliester; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Altele
hr-HR: Materijal zaslona: Aluminij; Stakloplastika; Staklo; Metal; Plastika; Polikarbonat (PC); Poliester; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Ostalo
ja: スクリーンの素材: アルミニウム; ガラス繊維; ガラス; 金属; プラスチック; ポリカーボネート (PC); ポリエステル; ステンレススチール; スチール; その他
fi: Suojan materiaali: Alumiini; Lasikuitu; Lasi; Metalli; Muovi; Polykarbonaatti (PC); Polyesteri; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Muu
ko: 스크린 소재: 알루미늄; 유리 섬유; 유리; 금속; 플라스틱; 폴리카보네이트(PC); 폴리에스테르; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 기타
nl: Hormateriaal: Aluminium; Glasvezel; Glas; Metaal; Plastic; Polycarbonaat (PC); Polyester; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Andere
en: Screen material: Aluminum; Fiberglass; Glass; Metal; Plastic; Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Stainless steel; Steel; Other
it: Materiale del vetro: Alluminio; Vetroresina; Vetro; Metallo; Plastica; Policarbonato (PC); Poliestere; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Altro
pt-PT: Material de filtragem: Alumínio; Fibra de vidro; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
tr: Sera perde malzemesi: Alüminyum; Fiberglas; Cam; Metal; Plastik; Polikarbonat (PC); Poliyester; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Diğer
hu: Képernyő anyaga: Alumínium; Üveggyapot; Üveg; Fém; Műanyag; Polikarbonát (PC); Poliészter; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Egyéb
es: Material de la pantalla: Aluminio; Fibra de vidrio; Vidrio; Metal; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Otros
zh-TW: 濾網材料: 鋁; 玻璃纖維; 玻璃; 金屬; 塑膠; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 聚酯; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 其他
cs: Materiál panelů: Hliník; Skelná vata; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Polykarbonát (PC); Polyester; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Jiné
th: วัสดุสำหรับหน้าจอ: อะลูมิเนียม; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แก้ว; โลหะ; พลาสติก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); โพลีเอสเตอร์; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
vi: Chất liệu màn hình: Nhôm; Sợi thủy tinh; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Nhựa; Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Khác
da: Skærmmateriale: Aluminum; Glasfiber; Glas; Metal; Plast; Polycarbonat (PC); Polyester; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Andet
pt-BR: Material da tela: Alumínio; Fibra de vidro; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
sl-SI: Material zaslona: Aluminij; Steklena vlakna; Steklo; Kovina; Plastika; Polikarbonat (PC); Poliester; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на екрана: Алуминий; Fiberglass; Стъкло; Метал; Пластмаса; Поликарбонат (PC); Полиестер; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Други
ru: Материал экрана: Алюминий; Стекловолокно; Стеклянные; Металл; Пластик; Поликарбонат (ПК); Полиэстер; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Другое
nb: Skjermmateriale: Aluminium; Glassfiber; Glass; Metall; Plast; Polykarbonat (PC); Polyester; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Annet
lt-LT: Ekrano medžiaga: Aliuminis; Stiklo pluoštas; Stiklas; Metalas; Plastikas; Polikarbonatas (PC); Poliesteris; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Kita
el: Υλικό οθόνης: Αλουμίνιο; Υαλοβάμβακας; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Πολυανθρακικό πολυμερές (PC); Πολυεστέρας; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Άλλο